th: ประเภทโครงสร้างของหมวกนิรภัย: โฟม; ฮาร์ดเชลล์; ไฮบริด; ซอฟต์เชลล์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 安全帽結構類型: 泡棉; 硬殼; 混合; 軟殼; 其他
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie prilby: Penová; Tvrdá škrupina; Hybridná; Mäkká škrupina; Iné
es: Tipo de construcción del casco: Espuma; Carcasa rígida; Híbrido; Carcasa blanda; Otro
ja: ヘルメット構造タイプ: フォーム; ハードシェル; ハイブリッド; ソフトシェル; その他
vi: Kiểu kết cấu mũ bảo hiểm: Bọt xốp; Vỏ cứng; Lai; Vỏ mềm; Khác
de: Helmkonstruktionstyp: Schaumstoff; Hartschale; Hybrid; Softshell; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do capacete: Espuma; Hardshell; Híbrido; Softshell; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta izdelave čelade: Pena; Trda lupina; Hibridna; Mehka lupina; Drugo
cs: Typ konstrukce přilby: Pěnová; Pevná skořepina (hardshell); Hybridní; Měkká skořepina (softshell); Jiná
it: Tipo di costruzione del casco: Schiuma; Guscio rigido; Ibrido; Guscio morbido; Altro
nl: Type helmconstructie: Schuim; Hardshell; Hybride; Softshell; Overig
lt-LT: Šalmo konstrukcijos tipas: Putplastis; Kieto kevalo („Hardshell“); Hibridinis; Minkšto kevalo („Softshell“); Kita
fr: Type de construction du casque: Mousse; Coque rigide; Hybride; Coque souple; Autre
pl: Typ konstrukcji kasku: Piankowa; Hardshell; Hybrydowa; Softshell; Inna
nb: Konstruksjonstype for hjelm: Skum; Hardshell; Hybrid; Softshell; Annet
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на каската: Пяна; Твърда обвивка; Хибридна; Мека обвивка; Други
ru: Тип конструкции шлема: Пеноматериал; Жесткий каркас; Гибридная; Мягкий каркас; Другое
hu: Sisak kialakításának típusa: Hab/szivacs; Kemény héjú; Hibrid; Puha héjú (Softshell); Egyéb
zh-CN: 头盔结构类型: 泡沫; 硬壳; 混合式; 软壳; 其他
en: Helmet construction type: Foam; Hardshell; Hybrid; Softshell; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do capacete: Espuma; Rígido; Híbrido; Macio; Outro
hr-HR: Konstrukcija kacige: Pjena; Tvrda ljuska; Hibridna; Mekana ljuska; Ostalo
da: Hjelmkonstruktionstype: Skum; Hardshell; Hybrid; Softshell; Andet
tr: Kask yapısı tipi: Köpük; Sert dış katman; Hibrit; Yumuşak dış katman; Diğer
sv: Typ av hjälmkonstruktion: Skum; Hårdskal; Hybrid; Mjukskal; Övrigt
fi: Kypärän rakennetyyppi: Vaahtomuovi; Kovakuorinen; Hybridi; Pehmeäkuorinen; Muu
el: Τύπος κατασκευής κράνους: Αφρός; Σκληρό περίβλημα; Υβριδική; Μαλακό περίβλημα; Άλλη
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al căștii: Spumă; Carcasă dură (hardshell); Hibrid; Softshell; Altele
ko: 헬멧 구조 유형: 폼; 하드쉘; 하이브리드; 소프트쉘; 기타